Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5761.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 36202. (1) The agricultural preservation fund is created
within in the state treasury.
(2) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from
any source for deposit into the fund, including federal funds,
other state revenues, gifts, bequests, and other donations. The
state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the fund
and shall credit to the fund interest and earnings from the
investments to the fund. investments.
RMH H02104'25 (H-4) fjmuhp


(3) Money Except as otherwise provided in this section, money
in the fund at the close of the fiscal year shall remain remains in
the fund and shall does not lapse to the general fund.
(4) The department is the administrator of the fund for audits
of the fund.
(5) Money in the fund may be expended, upon on appropriation,
as follows:
(a) Not more than $1,700,000.00 annually may be expended for
the administrative costs of the department and the board in
implementing this part and part 361.
(b) After expenditures for the administrative costs under
subdivision (a), money in the fund may be expended, upon on
approval of the board, to provide grants to local units of
government pursuant to under section 36203.
(c) If, after expenditures under subdivisions (a) and (b), the
amount of money remaining in the fund exceeds $5,000,000.00, money
in the fund may be expended, upon on approval of the board,
pursuant to under part 361 for the purchase of development rights
to farmland or the acquisition of agricultural conservation
easements.
(6) Expenditures of money in the fund as provided in this part
are consistent with the state's interest in preserving farmland and
are for an important public purpose.
(7) For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027,
$2,000,000.00 must be transferred from the fund to the state
general fund.
(8) For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2028,
$2,000,000.00 must be transferred from the fund to the state
general fund.
RMH H02104'25 (H-4) fjmuhp


(9) For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2029,
$2,000,000.00 must be transferred from the fund to the state
general fund.
Final Page
RMH H02104'25 (H-4) fjmuhp